Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3122
Rules, regulations, orders, judicial or administrative proceedings, and references in law; how treated.

All rules, regulations, and orders of the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Health and Human Services Finance and Support, or the Department of Health and Human Services Regulation and Licensure or their predecessor agencies adopted prior to July 1, 2007, in connection with the powers, duties, and functions transferred to the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to the Health and Human Services Act, shall continue to be effective until revised, amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law.

No suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or administrative, lawfully commenced prior to July 1, 2007, or which could have been commenced prior to that date, by or against any of such departments, or any director or employee thereof in such director's or employee's official capacity or in relation to the discharge of his or her official duties, shall abate by reason of the transfer of duties and functions from the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Health and Human Services Finance and Support, or the Department of Health and Human Services Regulation and Licensure to the Department of Health and Human Services.

On and after July 1, 2007, unless otherwise specified, whenever any provision of law refers to the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Health and Human Services Finance and Support, or the Department of Health and Human Services Regulation and Licensure in connection with duties and functions transferred to the Department of Health and Human Services, such law shall be construed as referring to such department.

Laws 2007, LB296, § 13.